apertium-pl-csb.pl.dix
    <pardef n="czwor/o__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giem</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dwoj/e__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giem</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="czwor/o__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giem</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="czworo"><i>czwor</i><par n="czwor/o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dwoje"><i>dwoj</i><par n="dwoj/e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="troje"><i>troj</i><par n="dwoj/e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="czworo"><i>czwor</i><par n="czwor/o__det"/></e>
